Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-327
Public buildings; works of art; how displayed.

The works of art acquired pursuant to the provisions of sections 82-317 to 82-329, 85-106 to 85-106.03, and 85-304 to 85-304.03 shall be displayed in areas of the buildings open to the public.

Laws 1978, LB 664, § 19.